Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2676.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [43A.205] TRAINING EMPLOYEES ON PREVENTING, RECOGNIZING, AND REACTING TO FRAUD. new text end new text begin The commissioner of management and budget must provide annual training to state employees on preventing, recognizing, and reacting to suspected fraud or misuse of state funds. The training must highlight the legal requirements of the employee to report fraud and must require each employee to sign an acknowledgment that the employee has completed the annual training, and that the employee is aware of the consequences for failing to report fraud and to make a payment on a claim or demand in violation of section 609.455. new text end